Utah statutes.
63G-2-406.   Evidentiary standards for release of certain enforcement and litigation records.

(1)  A record that is classified as protected under Subsection 63G-2-305(9), (16), (17), (22), (23), or (32) may be ordered to be disclosed under the provisions of Subsection 63G-2-401(6), 63G-2-403(11)(b), or 63G-2-404(8)(a) only if the person or party seeking disclosure of the record has established, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the public interest favoring access is equal to or greater than the interest favoring restriction of access.

(2)  A record that is classified as protected under Subsection 63G-2-305(10) may be ordered to be disclosed under the provisions of Subsection 63G-2-401(6), 63G-2-403(11)(b), or 63G-2-404(8) only if the person or party seeking disclosure of the record has established, by clear and convincing evidence, that the public interest favoring access is equal to or greater than the interest favoring restriction of access.



Enacted by Chapter 377, 2012 General Session

